Utah statutes.
72-10-127.   Tampering with aircraft forbidden.
It shall be unlawful for any person, without express or implied authority of
the owner, to operate, climb upon, enter, manipulate the controls or
accessories of, set in motion, remove parts or contents of, or otherwise
tamper with any civil aircraft within this state, or knowingly cause or permit
the same to be done.
